District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-115.07a

Clearance report required; Record keeping requirements.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 8a
as added Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(i), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596

History